Vermont, session 2025-2026, H100.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 164 is amended to read:
§ 164. STATE BOARD; GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES
The State Board shall engage local school board members and the broader
education community and, consistent with the provisions of this title, its own
rules, and rules adopted by the Secretary, establish and regularly update a long-
VT LEG #378669 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.100
2025 Page 2 of 8
term strategic vision for the delivery of educational services in Vermont;
advise the General Assembly, the Governor, and the Secretary of Education on
high-priority educational policies and issues as they arise; and act in
accordance with legislative mandates, including the adoption of rules and
executing special assignments. In addition to other specified duties, the Board
shall have supervision over and management of the Department of Education
and the public school system, except as otherwise provided, and shall:
* * *
(4) Biennially cause to be prepared a recommended budget for all
money to be expended by the Department of Education.
* * *
(10) Establish an information clearinghouse and accessible database to
help districts share information about educational programs and practices that
improve student performance and well-being. Educational programs and
practices include those designed to create and sustain a safe learning
environment.
* * *
(17) Report annually on the condition of education statewide and on a
supervisory union and school district basis. The report shall include
information on attainment of standards for student performance adopted under
subdivision (9) of this section,; number and types of complaints of hazing,
VT LEG #378669 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.100
2025 Page 3 of 8
harassment, or bullying made pursuant to chapter 9, subchapter 5 of this title
and responses to the complaints,; financial resources and expenditures,; and
community social indicators. The report shall be organized and presented in a
way that is easily understandable by the general public and that enables each
school, school district, and supervisory union to determine its strengths and
weaknesses. To the extent consistent with State and federal privacy laws and
regulations, data on hazing, harassment, or bullying incidents shall be
disaggregated by incident type, including disaggregation by ethnic groups,
racial groups, religious groups, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity,
disability status, and English language learner status. The Secretary
Commissioner shall use the information in the report to determine whether
students in each school, school district, and supervisory union are provided
educational opportunities substantially equal to those provided in other
schools, school districts, and supervisory unions pursuant to subsection 165(b)
of this title.
* * *
(19) Develop, in consultation with the Secretary of State, and make
available to school boards, sample ballot language for items that may be voted
on by Australian ballot and for which no statutory language exists.
* * *
VT LEG #378669 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.100
2025 Page 4 of 8
(21) Report annually to the Governor and the General Assembly on the
progress the Board has made on the development of education policy for the
State. [Repealed.]
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 163 is amended to read:
§ 163. STAFF; MEETINGS
(a) The office of the Board shall be supported by adequate staff, who shall
report to the Board the office of the Commissioner of Education.
* * *
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. chapter 5 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 5. SECRETARY COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION
Subchapter 1. Secretary Commissioner of Education
§ 211. APPOINTMENT; REPORTS
(a) Subject to the approval of the Governor, the State Board shall employ a
competent chief executive officer and secretary of the Board who shall have
had special training and experience in educational work and who shall be
called the Commissioner of Education. The Commissioner shall be appointed
for an indefinite term and shall be subject to removal upon the majority vote of
the entire Board.
(b) The Commissioner at all times and in such detail as the Board directs
shall make reports to the Board concerning the public educational system,
VT LEG #378669 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.100
2025 Page 5 of 8
together with such recommendations as the Commissioner deems proper for
the promotion of the educational interests of the State.
§ 212. SECRETARY’S COMMISSIONER’S DUTIES GENERALLY
The Secretary Commissioner shall execute those policies adopted by the
State Board in the legal exercise of its powers and shall:
* * *
(14) Annually, communicate to each superintendent a list of information
that a supervisory union, a school board, a school district, a school, a school
district employee, or a supervisory union employee is required under State or
federal law to make available to the electorate, community members, parents,
or students. It is the intent of this subdivision that the Secretary Commissioner
shall make a good faith effort to compile a complete list of the information to
be made available. Due to the difficult nature of compiling such a list, it is
also the intent that failure to include relevant information on the list shall not
constitute grounds for an action against the Secretary Commissioner.
* * *
(19) Establish an information clearinghouse and accessible database to
help districts share information about educational programs and practices that
improve student performance. Educational programs and practices include
those designed to create and sustain a safe learning environment. [Repealed.]
VT LEG #378669 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.100
2025 Page 6 of 8
(20) Develop, in consultation with the Secretary of State, and make
available to school boards sample ballot language for issues that may be
decided by Australian ballot and for which no statutory language exists.
[Repealed.]
(21) Prepare a budget for the Agency and submit it to the Governor after
review by the State Board. [Repealed.]
(22) Annually, prior to September 1, present the Governor’s education
policy priorities to the State Board. [Repealed.]
§ 213. DEPUTY SECRETARIES COMMISSIONERS AND HELPING
TEACHERS
The Secretary Board shall employ such number of deputy secretaries
commissioners and such number of competent helping teachers as he or she it
deems necessary. It shall determine the tenure of office of the deputy
commissioners and helping teachers and fix the compensation of the helping
teachers, which shall be paid by the State. The Board may remove such staff
as the best interests of the schools from time to time may require.
* * *
VT LEG #378669 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.100
2025 Page 7 of 8
Sec. 4. 3 V.S.A. § 212 is amended to read:
§ 212. DEPARTMENTS CREATED
The following administrative departments are hereby created, through the
instrumentality of which the Governor, under the Constitution, shall exercise
such functions as are by law assigned to each department respectively:
* * *
(6) The Department of Education
* * *
Sec. 5. 3 V.S.A. § 256(b) is amended to read:
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all secretaries of State
agencies and all commissioners of State departments, other than the
Commissioner of Education, shall take office only with the advice and consent
of the Senate except in the case of an appointment to fill a vacancy when the
General Assembly is not in session in which case the appointee may take office
subject to the provisions of section 257 of this title.
Sec. 6. REPEAL
3 V.S.A. chapter 49 is repealed.
Sec. 7. COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION; TRANSITION; POWERS
AND DUTIES
On January 1, 2026:
VT LEG #378669 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.100
2025 Page 8 of 8
(1) the Commissioner of Education shall assume all powers, duties,
rights, and responsibilities of the Secretary of Education; provided, however,
that if a Commissioner appointed by the State Board has not assumed office on
or before January 1, 2026, then the Secretary or acting Secretary of the Agency
on that date shall continue to perform the duties until the day on which the
Commissioner assumes office, but shall report to the Board and not the
Governor; and
(2) the Department of Education shall assume all the powers, duties,
rights, and responsibilities of the Agency of Education.
Sec. 8. LEGISLATIVE COUNSEL; PREPARATION OF A DRAFT BILL
On or before January 15, 2026, the Office of Legislative Counsel shall
prepare and submit a draft bill to the House and Senate Committees on
Education that makes statutory amendments of a technical nature and identifies
all statutory sections that the General Assembly shall amend substantively to
effect the intent of the act.
Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378669 v.1